Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1502
Kinds of executions.

Executions are of two kinds: (1) Against the property of the judgment debtor, and (2) for delivery of the possession of real property with damages for withholding the same and costs.

R.S.1867, Code § 475, p. 472;

R.S.1913, § 8043;

C.S.1922, § 8984;

C.S.1929, § 20-1502;

R.S.1943, § 25-1502.